Illinois, session 104th, HB1370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 42 and by adding Section 52.6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/42)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1042)7    Sec. 42. Civil penalties. 8    (a) Except as provided in this Section, any person that 9violates any provision of this Act or any regulation adopted 10by the Board, or any permit or term or condition thereof, or 11that violates any order of the Board pursuant to this Act, 12shall be liable for a civil penalty of not to exceed $50,000 13for the violation and an additional civil penalty of not to 14exceed $10,000 for each day during which the violation 15continues; such penalties may, upon order of the Board or a 16court of competent jurisdiction, be made payable to the 17Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 18with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 19Act.20    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 21this Section:22        (1) Any person that violates Section 12(f) of this Act 23    or any NPDES permit or term or condition thereof, or any   HB1370- 2 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 2    NPDES permit program, shall be liable to a civil penalty 3    of not to exceed $10,000 per day of violation.4        (2) Any person that violates Section 12(g) of this Act 5    or any UIC permit or term or condition thereof, or any 6    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 7    State UIC program for all wells, except Class II wells as 8    defined by the Board under this Act, shall be liable to a 9    civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 per day of violation; 10    provided, however, that any person who commits such 11    violations relating to the State UIC program for Class II 12    wells, as defined by the Board under this Act, shall be 13    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $10,000 for the 14    violation and an additional civil penalty of not to exceed 15    $1,000 for each day during which the violation continues.16        (3) Any person that violates Sections 21(f), 21(g), 17    21(h) or 21(i) of this Act, or any RCRA permit or term or 18    condition thereof, or any filing requirement, regulation 19    or order relating to the State RCRA program, shall be 20    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $25,000 per day 21    of violation.22        (4) In an administrative citation action under Section 23    31.1 of this Act, any person found to have violated any 24    provision of subsection (o) of Section 21 of this Act 25    shall pay a civil penalty of $500 for each violation of 26    each such provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by   HB1370- 3 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1    the Board and the Agency. Such penalties shall be made 2    payable to the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be 3    used in accordance with the provisions of the 4    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 5    unit of local government issued the administrative 6    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 7    unit of local government.8        (4-5) In an administrative citation action under 9    Section 31.1 of this Act, any person found to have 10    violated any provision of subsection (p) of Section 21, 11    Section 22.38, Section 22.51, Section 22.51a, or 12    subsection (k) of Section 55 of this Act shall pay a civil 13    penalty of $1,500 for each violation of each such 14    provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by the Board 15    and the Agency, except that the civil penalty amount shall 16    be $3,000 for each violation of any provision of 17    subsection (p) of Section 21, Section 22.38, Section 18    22.51, Section 22.51a, or subsection (k) of Section 55 19    that is the person's second or subsequent adjudication 20    violation of that provision. The penalties shall be 21    deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to 22    be used in accordance with the provisions of the 23    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 24    unit of local government issued the administrative 25    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 26    unit of local government.  HB1370- 4 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1        (5) Any person who violates subsection 6 of Section 2    39.5 of this Act or any CAAPP permit, or term or condition 3    thereof, or any fee or filing requirement, or any duty to 4    allow or carry out inspection, entry or monitoring 5    activities, or any regulation or order relating to the 6    CAAPP shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed 7    $10,000 per day of violation.8        (6) Any owner or operator of a community water system 9    that violates subsection (b) of Section 18.1 or subsection 10    (a) of Section 25d-3 of this Act shall, for each day of 11    violation, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5 12    for each of the premises connected to the affected 13    community water system.14        (7) Any person who violates Section 52.5 of this Act 15    shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for the 16    first violation of that Section and a civil penalty of up 17    to $2,500 for a second or subsequent violation of that 18    Section. 19        (8) Any person who violates Section 52.6 of this Act 20    shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to $10,000 for 21    the first violation of that Section and a civil penalty of 22    up to $30,000 for a second or subsequent violation of that 23    Section. 24    (b.5) In lieu of the penalties set forth in subsections 25(a) and (b) of this Section, any person who fails to file, in a 26timely manner, toxic chemical release forms with the Agency   HB1370- 5 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1pursuant to Section 25b-2 of this Act shall be liable for a 2civil penalty of $100 per day for each day the forms are late, 3not to exceed a maximum total penalty of $6,000. This daily 4penalty shall begin accruing on the thirty-first day after the 5date that the person receives the warning notice issued by the 6Agency pursuant to Section 25b-6 of this Act; and the penalty 7shall be paid to the Agency. The daily accrual of penalties 8shall cease as of January 1 of the following year. All 9penalties collected by the Agency pursuant to this subsection 10shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 11and Inspection Fund.12    (c) Any person that violates this Act, any rule or 13regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 14condition of a permit, or any Board order and causes the death 15of fish or aquatic life shall, in addition to the other 16penalties provided by this Act, be liable to pay to the State 17an additional sum for the reasonable value of the fish or 18aquatic life destroyed. Any money so recovered shall be placed 19in the Wildlife and Fish Fund in the State Treasury.20    (d) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 21recovered in a civil action.22    (e) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 23violation occurred, or the Attorney General, may, at the 24request of the Agency or on his own motion, institute a civil 25action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 26restrain violations of this Act, any rule or regulation   HB1370- 6 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1adopted under this Act, any permit or term or condition of a 2permit, or any Board order, or to require such other actions as 3may be necessary to address violations of this Act, any rule or 4regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 5condition of a permit, or any Board order.6    (f) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 7violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring such 8actions in the name of the people of the State of Illinois. 9Without limiting any other authority which may exist for the 10awarding of attorney's fees and costs, the Board or a court of 11competent jurisdiction may award costs and reasonable 12attorney's fees, including the reasonable costs of expert 13witnesses and consultants, to the State's Attorney or the 14Attorney General in a case where he has prevailed against a 15person who has committed a willful, knowing, or repeated 16violation of this Act, any rule or regulation adopted under 17this Act, any permit or term or condition of a permit, or any 18Board order.19    Any funds collected under this subsection (f) in which the 20Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited in the 21Hazardous Waste Fund created in Section 22.2 of this Act. Any 22funds collected under this subsection (f) in which a State's 23Attorney has prevailed shall be retained by the county in 24which he serves.25    (g) All final orders imposing civil penalties pursuant to 26this Section shall prescribe the time for payment of such   HB1370- 7 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1penalties. If any such penalty is not paid within the time 2prescribed, interest on such penalty at the rate set forth in 3subsection (a) of Section 1003 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, 4shall be paid for the period from the date payment is due until 5the date payment is received. However, if the time for payment 6is stayed during the pendency of an appeal, interest shall not 7accrue during such stay.8    (h) In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be 9imposed under subdivisions (a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), 10(b)(5), (b)(6), or (b)(7), or (b)(8) of this Section, the 11Board is authorized to consider any matters of record in 12mitigation or aggravation of penalty, including, but not 13limited to, the following factors:14        (1) the duration and gravity of the violation;15        (2) the presence or absence of due diligence on the 16    part of the respondent in attempting to comply with 17    requirements of this Act and regulations thereunder or to 18    secure relief therefrom as provided by this Act;19        (3) any economic benefits accrued by the respondent 20    because of delay in compliance with requirements, in which 21    case the economic benefits shall be determined by the 22    lowest cost alternative for achieving compliance;23        (4) the amount of monetary penalty which will serve to 24    deter further violations by the respondent and to 25    otherwise aid in enhancing voluntary compliance with this 26    Act by the respondent and other persons similarly subject   HB1370- 8 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1    to the Act;2        (5) the number, proximity in time, and gravity of 3    previously adjudicated violations of this Act by the 4    respondent;5        (6) whether the respondent voluntarily self-disclosed, 6    in accordance with subsection (i) of this Section, the 7    non-compliance to the Agency;8        (7) whether the respondent has agreed to undertake a 9    "supplemental environmental project", which means an 10    environmentally beneficial project that a respondent 11    agrees to undertake in settlement of an enforcement action 12    brought under this Act, but which the respondent is not 13    otherwise legally required to perform; and14        (8) whether the respondent has successfully completed 15    a Compliance Commitment Agreement under subsection (a) of 16    Section 31 of this Act to remedy the violations that are 17    the subject of the complaint. 18    In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be imposed 19under subsection (a) or paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), or 20(7), or (8) of subsection (b) of this Section, the Board shall 21ensure, in all cases, that the penalty is at least as great as 22the economic benefits, if any, accrued by the respondent as a 23result of the violation, unless the Board finds that 24imposition of such penalty would result in an arbitrary or 25unreasonable financial hardship. However, such civil penalty 26may be off-set in whole or in part pursuant to a supplemental   HB1370- 9 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1environmental project agreed to by the complainant and the 2respondent.3    (i) A person who voluntarily self-discloses non-compliance 4to the Agency, of which the Agency had been unaware, is 5entitled to a 100% reduction in the portion of the penalty that 6is not based on the economic benefit of non-compliance if the 7person can establish the following:8        (1) that either the regulated entity is a small entity 9    or the non-compliance was discovered through an 10    environmental audit or a compliance management system 11    documented by the regulated entity as reflecting the 12    regulated entity's due diligence in preventing, detecting, 13    and correcting violations;14        (2) that the non-compliance was disclosed in writing 15    within 30 days of the date on which the person discovered 16    it;17        (3) that the non-compliance was discovered and 18    disclosed prior to:19            (i) the commencement of an Agency inspection, 20        investigation, or request for information;21            (ii) notice of a citizen suit;22            (iii) the filing of a complaint by a citizen, the 23        Illinois Attorney General, or the State's Attorney of 24        the county in which the violation occurred;25            (iv) the reporting of the non-compliance by an 26        employee of the person without that person's   HB1370- 10 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1        knowledge; or2            (v) imminent discovery of the non-compliance by 3        the Agency;4        (4) that the non-compliance is being corrected and any 5    environmental harm is being remediated in a timely 6    fashion;7        (5) that the person agrees to prevent a recurrence of 8    the non-compliance;9        (6) that no related non-compliance events have 10    occurred in the past 3 years at the same facility or in the 11    past 5 years as part of a pattern at multiple facilities 12    owned or operated by the person;13        (7) that the non-compliance did not result in serious 14    actual harm or present an imminent and substantial 15    endangerment to human health or the environment or violate 16    the specific terms of any judicial or administrative order 17    or consent agreement;18        (8) that the person cooperates as reasonably requested 19    by the Agency after the disclosure; and20        (9) that the non-compliance was identified voluntarily 21    and not through a monitoring, sampling, or auditing 22    procedure that is required by statute, rule, permit, 23    judicial or administrative order, or consent agreement.24    If a person can establish all of the elements under this 25subsection except the element set forth in paragraph (1) of 26this subsection, the person is entitled to a 75% reduction in   HB1370- 11 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1the portion of the penalty that is not based upon the economic 2benefit of non-compliance.3    For the purposes of this subsection (i), "small entity" 4has the same meaning as in Section 221 of the federal Small 5Business Regulatory Enforcement Fairness Act of 1996 (5 U.S.C. 6601). 7    (j) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 8apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 9Section 22.52 of this Act shall be liable for an additional 10civil penalty of up to 3 times the gross amount of any 11pecuniary gain resulting from the violation. 12    (k) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 13apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 14subdivision (a)(7.6) of Section 31 of this Act shall be liable 15for an additional civil penalty of $2,000. 16(Source: P.A. 102-310, eff. 8-6-21.) 17    (415 ILCS 5/52.6 new)18    Sec. 52.6. Microfiber filters. 19    (a) As used in this Section: 20    "Microfiber filtration system" means a filtration unit 21that is active across all washing cycles and is: 22        (1) integrated into the washing machine design as a 23    built-in filter; or24        (2) included as an in-line filter and is packaged, 25    sold, and installed with the washing machine.   HB1370- 12 -LRB104 08348 BDA 18399 b1    "Washing machine" means a machine designed and used for 2washing clothes and linen. 3    (b) On and after January 1, 2030, no person shall sell or 4offer for sale in this State a new washing machine for 5residential, commercial, or State use unless the washing 6machine:7        (1) contains a microfiber filtration system with a 8    mesh size of not greater than 100 micrometers; and 9        (2) bears a conspicuous label that is visible to the 10    consumer, in the form of a sticker or any other label type, 11    that includes the following statement: "Notice: This 12    washing machine contains a filter to capture microfibers. 13    Check the filter regularly and dispose of captured lint in 14    a waste bin.". 15    (c) This Section does not impair or impede any other 16rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under 17any other law. The remedies provided in paragraph (8) of 18subsection (b) of Section 42 are cumulative with any other 19remedies available under any other law.